District of Columbia statutes.
38-1837.01

Establishment.

(a)

There is established a Public Charter School Facilities Allotment Task Force (“Task Force”). The Task Force shall:

(1)

Consult with:

(A)

Public charter schools;

(B)

The Council;

(C)

Relevant District government agencies; and

(D)

Banking, or other financial, professionals to determine the financial implications of any changes to the current uniform per student formula for the public charter schools facilities allotment.

(2)

Conduct a comprehensive analysis of facilities expenditures among public charter schools, including the allowable facilities expenditures recommended by the Mayor, and identify additional factors bearing on expenditures, if any, for consideration;

(3)

Develop recommendations for a cost-based allocation formula for the public charter schools facilities allotment; and

(4)

Identify cost-saving strategies and measures to ensure that public charter schools facilities allotment funds are used exclusively on public charter school facilities.

(b)

The Task Force shall submit to the Council its analysis and recommendations, including its recommendation for a cost-based allocation formula for the public charter schools facilities allotment, by November 30, 2009.

(c)

The Task Force shall be disbanded by no later than December 31, 2009.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 4021, 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4021 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4021 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4021 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short Title

Short title: Section 4020 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle C of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Public Charter School Facilities Allotment Task Force Establishment Act of 2009”.